New York, session 2025-2026, S3892.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 7-b and 9 of section 526 of the public author- 2 ities law, subdivision 7-b as added and subdivision 9 as amended by 3 chapter 219 of the laws of 2010, are amended to read as follows: 4 7-b. The term ["walkway over the Hudson bridge"] "Eleanor Roosevelt 5 Walkway" shall be deemed to mean the Poughkeepsie-Highland railroad 6 bridge which was constructed across the Hudson river north of the Frank- 7 lin Delano Roosevelt Mid-Hudson bridge[.]; 8 9. The term "bridges" shall be deemed to mean collectively Mid-Hudson 9 bridge, Rip Van Winkle bridge, Bear Mountain bridge, Kingston-Rhinecliff 10 bridge, both spans of the Hamilton Fish Newburgh-Beacon bridge, [walkway 11 over the Hudson bridge] Eleanor Roosevelt Walkway, and incidental roads, 12 approaches, structures and facilities; 13 § 2. Subdivisions 1-a, 8 and 17 of section 528 of the public authori- 14 ties law, subdivisions 1-a and 8 as amended and subdivision 17 as added 15 by chapter 219 of the laws of 2010, are amended to read as follows: 16 1-a. To hold in the name of the state any real property acquired for 17 its corporate purposes and, with the approval of the commissioner, to 18 sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any real property or 19 rights or easements therein, heretofore or hereafter acquired pursuant 20 to the "state bridge authority act", determined by it to be not neces- 21 sary for its corporate purposes, and shall accept ownership of the 22 [walkway over the Hudson bridge] Eleanor Roosevelt Walkway in the name 23 of the state, and acquire such incidental roads, approaches, structures 24 and facilities as may be necessary. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07574-01-5 S. 3892 2 1 8. To charge tolls for the use of the bridges, with the exception of 2 the [walkway over the Hudson bridge] Eleanor Roosevelt Walkway, subject 3 to and in accordance with such agreements with bondholders and notehold- 4 ers as may be made as hereinafter provided, except, however, that 5 subject to such agreements the rates of tolls charged on the Franklin 6 Delano Roosevelt Mid-Hudson bridge, the Kingston Rhinecliff bridge, the 7 Bear Mountain bridge, the Rip Van Winkle bridge, and the Hamilton Fish 8 Newburgh-Beacon bridge shall be the same. 9 17. To enter into a lease or operating agreement, for a period not to 10 exceed ninety-nine years, with the office of parks, recreation and 11 historic preservation for all or a portion of the [walkway over the 12 Hudson bridge] Eleanor Roosevelt Walkway for the purpose of a state 13 park. Such agreement may assign or allocate responsibility for the 14 construction, operation, maintenance, replacement and management of the 15 deck and approaches and structures providing public access to the state 16 park, but the authority shall retain responsibility for maintaining the 17 superstructure of the [walkway over the Hudson bridge] Eleanor Roosevelt 18 Walkway. The office of parks, recreation and historic preservation is 19 authorized to enter into such agreement, which may include the installa- 20 tion and maintenance by the office of parks, recreation and historic 21 preservation of any personal property and equipment used in connection 22 therewith. The office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 23 shall propose in its annual budget an amount for all costs and obli- 24 gations under such agreement and these costs may be supplemented by 25 private donations. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.